District of Columbia statutes.
16-3904

Set-off or counterclaim; pleading; retention of jurisdiction.

If the defendant in an action pursuant to this chapter, asserts a set-off or counterclaim, the judge may require a formal plea of set-off to be filed, or may waive the requirement. If the plaintiff requires time to prepare his defense against the counterclaim or set-off, the judge may continue the case for that purpose. When the set-off or counterclaim is for more than the jurisdictional limit of the Small Claims and Conciliation Branch, as provided by section 11-1321 , but within the jurisdiction of the Superior Court, the action shall nevertheless remain in the Branch and be tried therein in its entirety.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 610, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 564, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(p)(5)
1973 Ed., § 16-3904.
1981 Ed., § 16-3904.